Washington statutes.
RCW 13.40.580

Youth courts—Diversion.

Youth courts provide a diversion for cases involving juvenile offenders, in which participants, under the supervision of an adult coordinator, may serve in various capacities within the program, acting in the role of jurors, lawyers, bailiffs, clerks, and judges. Youths who appear before youth courts are youths eligible for diversion pursuant to *RCW 13.40.070 (6) and (7). Youth courts have no jurisdiction except as provided for in chapter 237, Laws of 2002. Youth courts are diversion units and not courts established under Article IV of the state Constitution.

[ 2002 c 237 s 9.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 13.40.070 was amended by 2010 c 289 s 7, changing subsection (7) to subsection (8).